Illinois, session 104th, HB1311.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Employee Classification Act is amended by 5adding Section 12 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 185/12 new)7    Sec. 12. Internal Revenue Service guidelines. In making a 8determination of a worker's classification under this Act, the 9Department shall consider any guidance provided by the 10Internal Revenue Service of the United States Department of 11the Treasury.